Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 27 SOIL CONSERVATION DISTRICTS
§ 22-2733. Grants from state soil and water conservation commission general fund — Application — Approval — Grant agreement.

Eligible applicants or participants may file an application with the local soil conservation district or the state soil and water conservation commission for a grant from the state soil and water conservation commission general fund for the purpose of financing conservation improvements, projects and implementation of the water quality program for agriculture. Such application shall be filed in such a manner and shall be in such form, and be accompanied by such information as may be prescribed by the commission; provided however, any such application filed with the district or the commission under the provisions of this section shall:

Describe the nature and purpose of the improvements or conservation plan implementation project;

Set forth or be accompanied by an improvement project plan approved by the local soil conservation district or the commission that identifies the practices to be applied, together with such technical and economic feasibility data and estimated costs as may be required by the commission;

State whether money other than that for which application is made under this section will be used for improvement project or conservation plan implementation costs, and whether such money is available or has been sought for this purpose; and

Show that the applicant or participant holds or can acquire title to all lands or has necessary easements and rights-of-way to implement the project plan.

The commission and local soil conservation district will keep each other informed of grant applications received. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of an application, the local soil conservation district or the commission shall review and evaluate and, if deemed necessary, investigate all aspects of the proposed improvement, project or conservation plan. As part of such investigation, the district or the commission shall determine whether the project plan is satisfactory. If the district or the commission determines that the plan is unsatisfactory, it shall return the application to the applicant or participant and the district or the commission may make such recommendations to the applicant or participant as are considered necessary to make the plan satisfactory. If the commission determines either the plan or a plan revised pursuant to recommendation of the district or commission is satisfactory, it shall be considered for funding.

The commission may approve a grant if after review, evaluation and investigation if necessary, it finds that:

The applicant or participant is qualified and responsible;

The improvement, project or conservation plan demonstrates public benefits; and

That money in the state soil and water conservation commission general fund is available for the grant.

If the commission approves a grant, the applicant or participant shall enter into an agreement covering the grant offer and acceptance of the grant for implementing the improvement, project or conservation plan. The agreement shall be improvement, project or conservation plan specific. The terms and conditions shall be those specified by the commission.
(5) Upon approval of the grant and securing all necessary documents, the commission will make available, in the approved form, project or contract funding.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2733, as added by 1992, ch. 270, § 7, p. 839; am. 1999, ch. 137, § 6, p. 386; am. 2003, ch. 107, § 9, p. 334; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 16, p. 719.

§ 22-2734. Cost-share from state soil and water conservation commission general fund — Application — Approval.

Eligible applicants or participants may file an application with the local soil conservation district or the state soil and water conservation commission for a cost-share contract or project from the state soil and water conservation commission general fund for the purpose of financing agricultural, grazing or other conservation improvements, projects or implementation of the water quality program for agriculture. Such application shall be filed in such a manner and shall be in such form and be accompanied by such information as may be prescribed by the commission; provided however, any such application filed with the district or the commission under the provisions of this section shall:

Describe the nature and purposes of the improvements and projects requiring cost-sharing;

Set forth or be accompanied by a plan that identifies the conservation improvements or projects, together with such technical and economic feasibility data and estimated costs as may be required by the commission;

State whether money other than that for which application is made under this section will be used for costs, and whether such money is available or has been sought for this purpose; and

Show the proposed project is feasible from a technical standpoint and is economically justified.

The commission and the local soil conservation district will keep each other informed of cost-share applications received. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of an application, the local soil conservation district or the commission shall review and evaluate and, if deemed necessary, investigate all aspects of the proposed contract or project. As part of such investigation, the district or the commission shall determine whether the plan for development of the conservation improvements or projects is satisfactory. If the district or the commission determines the plan is unsatisfactory, it shall return the application to the applicant or participant and the district or the commission may make such recommendations to the applicant or participant as are considered necessary to make the application satisfactory. When the commission determines either the application or an application revised pursuant to recommendation of the district or commission is satisfactory, it shall be considered for funding.

The commission may approve a cost-share contract to an applicant or participant for conservation projects and improvements if, after review, evaluation and investigation, it finds that:

The applicant or participant is qualified and responsible;

The conservation improvement or project demonstrates public benefit;

There is reasonable assurance that the applicant or participant will adhere to contract terms; and

Money is available in the state soil and water conservation commission general fund for cost-share.
(4) Upon approval of the cost-share contract or cost-share grant, and securing of all necessary documents, the commission will make funding available.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2734, as added by 1999, ch. 137, § 7, p. 386; am. 2003, ch. 107, § 10, p. 334; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 17, p. 719.

§ 22-2735. Payments by the state soil and water conservation commission — Rules — Approval of attorney general — Audit of payments.

The commission may make payments not to exceed the estimated reasonable cost of an eligible improvement, project or plan.

The commission may, in the name of the state of Idaho, enter into contracts with approved applicants, and any such approved applicants may enter into a contract with the commission concerning eligible improvements, projects or plans. Any such contract may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, and shall include, in substance, the following provisions:

An estimate of the reasonable cost of the improvements, projects or plans as determined by the commission;

The terms under which the commission may unilaterally terminate the contract and/or seek repayment from the applicant of sums already paid pursuant to the contract for noncompliance by the applicant with the terms and conditions of the contract and the provisions of this chapter;

An agreement by the applicant binding for the life of the eligible improvements, projects or plans:

To develop water quality plans for landowners and provide payments to landowners for installation of best management practices;

To determine payment rates in conjunction with the commission for best management practices;

To establish a method for administration and provisions for technical assistance to landowners in conjunction with the commission;

To allow the state to make payments up to the estimated reasonable cost for best management practices installation, technical assistance and project administration of an eligible project;

To develop and to secure the approval of the commission of plans for operation of the eligible project;

To ensure that the local matching share of the cost is provided as applicable;

To assure an adequate level of landowner participation and application of best management practices to ensure water quality goals are met.

The commission may enter into contracts to provide technical assistance to applicants that have entered agreements pursuant to this chapter. Any such contract may include such provisions agreed upon by the parties thereto and shall include, in substance, the following provisions:

An estimate of the reasonable cost of technical assistance;

The terms under which the commission may unilaterally terminate the contract, and/or seek repayment of sums paid pursuant to the contract, for noncompliance by the applicants with the terms and conditions of the contract, the provisions of this chapter, or rules adopted pursuant thereto.

The commission may enter into contracts and establish procedures to be followed in applying for eligible improvements, projects and plans herein authorized as shall be necessary for the effective administration of the water quality program for agriculture.

All contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall be subject to approval by the attorney general as to form. All payments by the state pursuant to such contracts shall be made after audit and upon warrant as provided by law on vouchers approved by the chairman and the administrator of the commission.

All grant agreements and contracts previously entered into with the state board of health and welfare, soil conservation districts and the commission pursuant to section 39-3627, Idaho Code, for payments and administration are now to be administered and payments implemented solely by the commission.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2735, as added by 1999, ch. 137, § 8, p. 386; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 18, p. 719.